Colorado, session 2026A, HB1366.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-4-402.4, add
(5)(b)(I.7) and (9)(l.5) as follows:
25.5-4-402.4. Hospitals - healthcare affordability and
sustainability hospital provider fee - healthcare affordability and
sustainability nursing facility provider fee - healthcare affordability
and sustainability intermediate care facility fee - receipt of public funds
- Colorado healthcare affordability and sustainability enterprise -
federal waiver - funds created - reports - rules - legislative declaration
- definitions - repeal.
(5) Healthcare affordability and sustainability hospital provider
fee cash fund.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(b) All money in the hospital provider fee cash fund is subject to
federal matching as authorized under federal law and, subject to annual
appropriation by the general assembly, shall be expended by the enterprise
for the following purposes:
(I.7) TO MAXIMIZE REIMBURSEMENT FOR PHYSICIAN SERVICES AT
DENVER HEALTH AND HOSPITAL AUTHORITY THROUGH A STATE-DIRECTED
PAYMENT PROGRAM, AS PERMITTED IN 42 CFR 438.6(c).
(9) Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(l.5) "PHYSICIAN SERVICES" MEANS MEDICALLY NECESSARY
SERVICES THAT ARE RENDERED BY A LICENSED PHYSICIAN OR QUALIFIED
MEDICAL PROFESSIONAL AND ARE BILLED SEPARATELY FROM HOSPITAL
FACILITY FEES.
SECTION 2. Appropriation. (1) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year,
$3,527,482 is appropriated to the department of health care policy and
financing. This appropriation is from the healthcare affordability and
sustainability hospital provider fee cash fund created in section
25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a)(I). To implement this act, the department may use this
appropriation for medical and long-term care services for Medicaid-eligible
individuals.
(2) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year, the general assembly
anticipates that the department of health care policy and financing will
receive $7,803,973 in federal funds for medical and long-term care services
for Medicaid-eligible individuals to implement this act. The appropriation
in subsection (1) of this section is based on the assumption that the
department will receive this amount of federal funds.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1366

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1366